Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1589.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 171.740 to
171.762.
SECTION 2. (1) A lobbyist registered with the Oregon Government Ethics Commission,
or required to register with the commission, that represents more than one client concur-
rently shall file a notice with the commission within three business days after:
(a) The lobbyist agrees to be a lobbyist with regard to new legislative action or adminis-
trative action for a new or existing client; or
(b) The lobbyist takes a new or different position on new or existing legislative action or
administrative action for any new or existing client.
(2) For any notice required under subsection (1) of this section, the lobbyist shall specify
the legislative action or administrative action and include whether the new or existing client,
at the time the lobbyist agrees to be a lobbyist for the client or takes a new or different
position:
(a) Supports the legislative action or administrative action;
(b) Supports the legislative action or administrative action if the action is amended;
(c) Opposes the legislative action or administrative action;
(d) Opposes the legislative action or administrative action unless the action is amended;
(e) Is neutrally monitoring the legislative action or administrative action;
(f) Is monitoring the legislative action or administrative action while seeking an amend-
ment to the action; or
(g) Is monitoring the legislative action or administrative action with concerns.
(3) A lobbyist who is an attorney:
(a) Shall provide the notice required under subsection (1) of this section in the same
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 140

SB 1589
manner as a lobbyist who is not an attorney; and
(b) May not invoke an attorney-client privilege or decline to provide the notice as pro-
tected from disclosure as confidential matters between an attorney and a client.
(4) A lobbyist who is required to provide notice under this section shall file with the
commission, in accordance with the schedule described in ORS 171.752, a statement that in-
cludes the total compensation received by the lobbyist from each client that is the subject
of the notice during the applicable reporting period.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to administer this section.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Client” means a person for whom a lobbyist provides personal services for money
or any other consideration for the purpose of lobbying.
(b) “Administrative action” includes any rule or regulation being promulgated by an
executive agency.
SECTION 3. ORS 171.756 is amended to read:
171.756. (1) A lobbyist may not instigate the introduction of any legislative action for the pur-
pose of obtaining employment to lobby in opposition to the legislative action.
(2) A lobbyist may not attempt to influence the vote of any member of the Legislative Assembly
by the promise of financial support of the candidacy of the member, or by threat of financing oppo-
sition to the candidacy of the member, at any future election.
(3) A person may not lobby or offer to lobby for consideration any part of which is contingent
upon the success of any lobbying activity.
(4) A legislative or executive official may not receive consideration other than from the State
of Oregon for acting as a lobbyist in Oregon.
(5) A lobbyist may not knowingly deceive or attempt to deceive a member of the Legis-
lative Assembly regarding the facts related to any pending or proposed legislative action or
administrative action, as defined in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
(6) A lobbyist may not knowingly represent an interest adverse to a client of the lobbyist
without full disclosure of the adverse interest to the client and without obtaining the client’s
written consent.
SECTION 4. ORS 171.772 is amended to read:
171.772. In carrying out the provisions of ORS 171.725 to 171.785, the Oregon Government Ethics
Commission shall:
(1) Prescribe by rule forms for registrations, statements [and reports], reports and notices re-
quired to be filed by ORS 171.725 to 171.785 and provide the forms to persons required to register
with the commission and to file the statements [and reports], reports and notices.
(2) Accept and file any information voluntarily supplied to the commission that exceeds the
requirements of ORS 171.725 to 171.785.
(3) Make [registrations, statements and reports] any registration, statement, report and notice
filed with the commission available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours,
and make copying facilities available at a charge not to exceed actual cost.
(4) Adopt by rule an electronic filing system under which [statements] any statement required
to be filed under ORS 171.745 and 171.750 must be filed with the commission in an electronic format.
The commission may not charge a fee for filing a statement under this subsection.
(5) Provide training on procedures for filing [statements] any statement under subsection (4) of
this section.
[2]

SB 1589
(6) Make [statements] any statement filed under ORS 171.745 and 171.750 available in a
searchable format for review by the public using the Internet.
SECTION 5. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[3]